District of Columbia statutes.
47-1069

American Psychological Association, lot 146, square 677.

The real estate described for assessment and taxation purposes as lot 146, square 677, in the District of Columbia, and the buildings located thereon, owned by APA 750 LLC, a wholly-owned subsidiary of the American Psychological Association, a District of Columbia nonprofit corporation, is hereby exempt from taxation for that portion of property owned by APA 750 LLC and occupied and used by the American Psychological Association to the extent that the property continues to be so owned and occupied, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1007 and 47-1009.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1222(b), 52 DCR 7503
Short title of subtitle AA of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1221 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle AA of title I of the act may be cited as the American Psychological Association Partial Real Property Tax Exemption Continuation Act of 2005.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1222(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).